Utah statutes.
73-10-7.   Title to projects -- Contractual powers of board.
Title of all projects constructed with funds made available by Section 73-10-8
hereof under the terms of this act shall become vested in the state of Utah.
The board is empowered to enter into contracts which are, in its opinion,
necessary for the maintenance and continued operation of such projects.
